Washington statutes.
RCW 43.113.005

Legislative declaration.

The legislature declares that it is the public policy of this state to insure equal opportunity for all of its citizens. The legislature finds that, for economic, social, and historical reasons, a disproportionate number of African Americans find themselves disadvantaged or isolated from the benefits of equal opportunity. The legislature believes that it is the duty of this state to improve the well-being of African Americans by enabling them to participate fully in all fields of endeavor and by assisting them in obtaining governmental services. The legislature further finds that the development of public policy and the delivery of governmental services to meet the special needs of African Americans can be improved by establishing a focal point in state government for the interests of African American citizens. Therefore, the legislature deems it necessary to establish in statute the commission on African American affairs to further these purposes.

[ 1992 c 96 s 1.]